Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Meetings

271B.7-010.
Annual meeting.

A corporation shall hold a meeting of shareholders annually at a time stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws.

Annual shareholders’ meetings may be held in or out of this state at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws. If no place is stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, annual meetings shall be held at the corporation’s principal office.

The failure to hold an annual meeting at the time stated in or fixed in accordance with a corporation’s bylaws shall not affect the validity of any corporate action.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 49, effective January 1, 1989.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Remedies to restrain or compel holding of stockholders’ meetings. 48 A.L.R.2d 615.

271B.7-020.
Special meeting.

A corporation shall hold a special meeting of shareholders:

On call of its board of directors or the person or persons authorized to do so by the articles of incorporation or bylaws; or

If the holders of at least thirty-three and one-third percent (331/3%) (or such higher or lower percentage as is contained in the articles of incorporation) of all the votes entitled to be cast on any issue proposed to be considered at the proposed special meeting sign, date, and deliver to the corporation’s secretary one (1) or more written demands for the meeting describing the purpose or purposes for which it is to be held.

If not otherwise fixed under KRS

271B.7-030

or

271B.7-070

, the record date for determining shareholders entitled to demand a special meeting shall be the date the first shareholder signs the demand.

Special shareholders’ meetings may be held in or out of this state at the place stated in or fixed in accordance with the bylaws. If no place is stated or fixed in accordance with the bylaws, special meetings shall be held at the corporation’s principal office.

Only business within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice required by subsection (3) of KRS

271B.7-050

may be conducted at a special shareholders’ meeting.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 50, effective January 1, 1989.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Service of process, holding directors’, officers’, stockholders’, or sales meetings or conventions in a state by foreign corporation as doing business or otherwise subjecting it to service of process and suit. 84 A.L.R.2d 412.

271B.7-030.
Court-ordered meeting.

The Circuit Court for the county where a corporation’s principal office (or, if none in this state, its registered office) is located may summarily order a meeting to be held:

On application of any shareholder of the corporation entitled to participate in an annual meeting if an annual meeting was not held within the earlier of six (6) months after the end of the corporation’s fiscal year or fifteen (15) months after its last annual meeting; or

On application of a shareholder who signed a demand for a special meeting valid under KRS

271B.7-020

, if:

Notice of the special meeting was not given within thirty (30) days after the date the demand was delivered to the corporation’s secretary; or

The special meeting was not held in accordance with the notice.

The court may fix the time and place of the meeting, determine the shares entitled to participate in the meeting, specify a record date for determining shareholders entitled to notice of and to vote at the meeting, prescribe the form and content of the meeting notice, fix the quorum required for specific matters to be considered at the meeting (or direct that the votes represented at the meeting constitute a quorum for action on those matters), and enter other orders necessary to accomplish the purpose or purposes of the meeting.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 51, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.7-040.
Action without meeting.

Except as provided in the articles of incorporation, action required or permitted by this chapter to be taken at a shareholders’ meeting may be taken without a meeting and without prior notice, except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, if the action is taken by all the shareholders entitled to vote on the action.

If the articles of incorporation so provide, any action except the election of directors by cumulative voting pursuant to KRS

271B.7-280

required or permitted by this chapter to be taken at a shareholders’ meeting may be taken without a meeting and without prior notice, except as provided in subsection (8) of this section, if the action is taken by shareholders entitled to vote on the action representing not less than eighty percent (80%), or such higher percentage required by this chapter or the articles of incorporation, of the votes entitled to be cast.

The action taken under this section shall be evidenced by one (1) or more written consents describing the action taken, signed by the shareholders taking the action, and delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records.

Action taken under this section shall be effective when consents representing the votes necessary to take the action under this section are delivered to the corporation, or upon delivery of the consents representing the necessary votes, as of a different date if specified in the consent.

Any shareholder giving a consent may revoke the consent by a writing received by the corporation prior to the time that consents representing the votes required to take the action under this section have been delivered to the corporation but may not do so thereafter.

A consent signed under this section shall have the effect of a meeting vote and may be described as such in any document.

Prompt notice of the taking of any action by shareholders without a meeting under this section by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those shareholders entitled to vote on the action who have not consented in writing.

If this chapter requires that notice of proposed action be given to nonvoting shareholders and the action is to be taken by consent of the voting shareholders under this section, the corporation shall give its nonvoting shareholders and voting shareholders whose consent is not solicited, written notice of the proposed action at least ten (10) days before the action is taken. The notice shall contain or be accompanied by the same material that, under this chapter, would have been required to be sent to nonvoting shareholders in a notice of meeting at which the proposed action would have been submitted to the shareholders for action.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 52, effective January 1, 1989; 2002, ch. 102, § 14, effective July 15, 2002; 2002, ch. 102, § 15, effective November 15, 2002.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(6/26/2007). 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 137, sec. 179, effective June 26, 2007 provided: The General Assembly finds and declares that the amendment of KRS

271B.6-210

,

271B.6-230

,

271B.7-040

,

271B.7-280

, and

271B.8-080

, as provided for in 2002 Ky. Acts ch. 102, secs. 10, 11, 15, 18, and 19, respectively, are and were effective as of November 15, 2002.

(11/15/02). 2002 Ky. Acts ch. 102, sec. 22, provides that this section “shall take effect November 15, 2002, if a constitutional amendment proposing to amend Sections 190, 191, 192, 193, 194, 195, 198, 200, 202, 203, 205, 207 and 208 of the Constitution of Kentucky relating to corporations is enacted by the General Assembly and approved by the voters in the November, 2002 general election.” Otherwise, [this section] shall be void.

A constitutional amendment proposing to amend 11 of those 13 sections of the Constitution was enacted by the General Assembly and approved by the voters. During the 2002 Regular Session, the General Assembly enacted 2002 Ky. Acts ch. 341, which proposed to amend Sections 190, 191, 192, 193, 194, 198, 200, 202, 203, 207, and 208 of the Constitution of Kentucky. The voters approved that amendment in the November, 2002 general elections.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Young, Modernizing Kentucky’s Corporate Laws, Vol. 67, No. 3, May 2003, Ky. Bench & Bar 12.

Rutledge, The 2002 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Corporation Act, Vol. 67, No. 3, May 2003, Ky. Bench & Bar 13.

Rutledge, Recent Amendments to Kentucky Business Entity Laws, Vol. 71, No. 5, Sept. 2007, Ky. Bench & Bar 25.

271B.7-050.
Notice of meeting.

A corporation shall notify shareholders of the date, time, and place of each annual and special shareholders’ meeting no fewer than ten (10) nor more than sixty (60) days before the meeting date. Unless this chapter or the articles of incorporation require otherwise, the corporation shall be required to give notice only to shareholders entitled to vote at the meeting.

Unless this chapter or the articles of incorporation require otherwise, notice of an annual meeting shall not be required to include a description of the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called.

Notice of a special meeting shall include a description of the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called.

If not otherwise fixed under KRS

271B.7-030

or

271B.7-070

, the record date for determining shareholders entitled to notice of and to vote at an annual or special shareholders’ meeting shall be the day before the first notice is delivered to shareholders.

Unless the bylaws require otherwise, if an annual or special shareholders’ meeting is adjourned to a different date, time, or place, notice shall not be required to be given of the new date, time, or place if the new date, time, or place is announced at the meeting before adjournment. If a new record date for the adjourned meeting is or must be fixed under KRS

271B.7-070

, however, notice of the adjourned meeting shall be given under this section to persons who are shareholders as of the new record date.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 53, effective January 1, 1989.

271B.7-060.
Waiver of notice.

A shareholder may waive any notice required by this chapter, the articles of incorporation, or bylaws before or after the date and time stated in the notice. The waiver shall be in writing, be signed by the shareholder entitled to the notice, and be delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records.

A shareholder’s attendance at a meeting shall:

Waive objection to lack of notice or defective notice of the meeting, unless the shareholder at the beginning of the meeting objects to holding the meeting or transacting business at the meeting; and

Waive objection to consideration of a particular matter at the meeting that is not within the purpose or purposes described in the meeting notice, unless the shareholder objects to considering the matter when it is presented.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 54, effective January 1, 1989.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Participation in meeting as waiver of compliance with notice requirement for shareholders’ meeting. 64 A.L.R.3d 358.

271B.7-070.
Record date.

The bylaws may fix or provide the manner of fixing the record date for one (1) or more voting groups in order to determine the shareholders entitled to notice of a shareholders’ meeting, to demand a special meeting, to vote, or to take any other action. If the bylaws do not fix or provide for fixing a record date, the board of directors of the corporation may fix a future date as the record date.

A record date fixed under this section shall not be more than seventy (70) days before the meeting or action requiring a determination of shareholders.

A determination of shareholders entitled to notice of or to vote at a shareholders’ meeting shall be effective for any adjournment of the meeting unless the board of directors fixes a new record date, which it shall do if the meeting is adjourned to a date more than one hundred twenty (120) days after the date fixed for the original meeting.

If a court orders a meeting adjourned to a date more than one hundred twenty (120) days after the date fixed for the original meeting, it may provide that the original record date continues in effect or it may fix a new record date.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 55, effective January 1, 1989.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Who may exercise voting power of corporate stock pending settlement of estate of deceased owner. 7 A.L.R.3d 629.

271B.7-080.
Remote communication.

If the board of directors is authorized to determine the place of an annual or special meeting of shareholders, the board of directors, in its sole discretion, may determine that the meeting shall not be held at any place but shall instead be held solely by means of remote communication under subsection (2) of this section.

If authorized by the board of directors in its sole discretion, and subject to such guidelines and procedures as the board of directors may adopt, shareholders and proxyholders not physically present at a meeting of shareholders may by means of remote communication:

Participate in a meeting of shareholders; and

Be deemed present in person and vote at a meeting of shareholders, whether such meeting is to be held at a designated place or solely by means of remote communication, if:

The corporation implements reasonable measures to verify that each person deemed present and permitted to vote at the meeting by means of remote communication is a shareholder or proxyholder;

The corporation implements reasonable measures to provide shareholders and proxyholders referred to in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph a reasonable opportunity to participate in the meeting and to vote on matters submitted to the shareholders, including an opportunity to read or hear the proceedings of the meeting substantially concurrently with the proceedings; and

The corporation records any vote or other action taken at the meeting by a shareholder or proxyholder by means of remote communication. The corporation shall maintain as a record the recorded vote or other action taken.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 102, § 21, effective July 15, 2002.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Rutledge, The 2002 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Corporation Act, Vol. 67, No. 3, May 2003, Ky. Bench & Bar 13.